Connecticut, session 2026, HB05416.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17b-105a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Social Services shall seek a waiver from
federal law to allow persons who live in an area in which (1) the
unemployment rate is greater than ten per cent, or (2) there is an
insufficient number of jobs to provide such persons with employment,
to be exempt from the three-month participation limit of the
supplemental nutrition assistance program implemented pursuant to
the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall implement vehicle
evaluation provisions in accordance with 7 CFR 273.8(f)(4).
(c) The Commissioner of Social Services, pursuant to 7 USC
2014(e)(6), shall implement the federal option to mandate the use of a
standard utility allowance, to be used in place of actual utility costs, for
LCO No. 2296 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5416
purposes of calculating the excess shelter deduction of applicants for, or
recipients of, supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits.
Pursuant to 7 USC 2014(e)(6)(C)(iii)(III), the commissioner shall not
prorate a standard utility allowance based upon the fact that an assisted
household shares the utility with an individual who is not a member of
the assisted household.
(d) Not later than December 31, 2024, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall enter into a contract with an outside vendor to update the
system utilized by the Department of Social Services to administer the
supplemental nutrition assistance program for the purpose of enabling
the department to stagger the distribution of program benefits so that
benefits are distributed, in accordance with federal law, to cohorts of
program beneficiaries designated by the commissioner at multiple
intervals during each month. Not later than March 1, 2026, the
commissioner shall commence staggering the distribution of such
benefits to such cohorts of beneficiaries each month, in accordance with
federal law. Not later than April 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall report, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to human services regarding the
staggering of distribution benefits pursuant to this subsection.
(e) The Commissioner of Social Services shall, within available
appropriations, provide to veterans the same level of supplemental
nutrition assistance program benefits as such veterans would have
received under such program without a work requirement, before such
a work requirement exemption for veterans was eliminated in the Food
and Nutrition Act of 2008, as amended by P.L. 119-21.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established the
Connecticut Farmers' Market/Veteran Nutrition Program which shall
be provided for from funds available to the Commissioner of
Agriculture and from other sources as such funds may become
available. The program shall supply Connecticut-grown fresh produce
LCO No. 2296 2 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5416
to veteran participants through the distribution of vouchers that are
redeemable only at designated Connecticut farmers' markets. For
purposes of this section, "veteran participant" means a veteran, as
defined in section 27-103 of the general statutes, who is sixty years of
age or older and (1) is currently residing in elderly housing, (2) is a
participant of a registered congregate meal site, or (3) has been
identified by a municipal veterans committee, director or
representative, as described in section 27-135 of the general statutes, as
being at nutritional risk. The program is designed to provide both a
supplemental source of fresh produce for the dietary needs of veterans
who are judged to be at nutritional risk and to stimulate an increased
demand for Connecticut-grown produce at Connecticut farmers'
markets. For purposes of this section, "fresh produce" means fruits and
vegetables that have not been processed in any manner and chicken
eggs.
(b) The program shall be administered by the Commissioner of
Agriculture who shall maintain all conditions for its operations.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-105a
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section